Wisconsin, session 2025, SB486.
do enact as follows:SB486,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB486,23Section 2. 20.445 (1) (aL) of the statutes is repealed.SB486,34Section 3. 20.445 (1) (am) of the statutes is created to read:SB486,3,7520.445 (1) (am) Unemployment insurance; general administration. As a 6continuing appropriation, the amounts in the schedule for administration of ch. 7108.SB486,48Section 4. 49.791 (4) (f) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB486,3,15949.791 (4) (f) Accepting test results from other programs. (intro.) For purposes 10of this section, an administering agency may use results of a drug test performed by 11the administering agency for the purpose of eligibility for another state program, 12including a work experience program under s. 49.162, or 49.36, or 108.133, 13performed at the request of the department of corrections, or performed by other 14drug testing providers as approved by the department to determine whether to 15refer an able-bodied adult to treatment if all of the following apply:SB486,516Section 5. 102.43 (9) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:SB486,3,2017102.43 (9) (e) The employee’s employment with the employer has been 18suspended or terminated due to misconduct, as defined in s. 108.04 (5), or 19substantial fault, as defined in s. 108.04 (5g) (a), by the employee connected with 20the employee’s work.SB486,621Section 6. 108.04 (5) (intro.) of the statutes is renumbered 108.04 (5) (cm) 22and amended to read:SB486,4,1923108.04 (5) (cm) An employee whose work is terminated by an employing unit 1for misconduct by the employee connected with the employee’s work is ineligible to 2receive benefits until 7 weeks have elapsed since the end of the week in which the 3discharge occurs and the employee earns wages after the week in which the 4discharge occurs equal to at least 14 times the employee’s weekly benefit rate under 5s. 108.05 (1) in employment or other work covered by the unemployment insurance 6law of any state or the federal government. For purposes of requalification, the 7employee’s weekly benefit rate shall be the rate that would have been paid had the 8discharge not occurred. The wages paid to an employee by an employer which 9terminates employment of the employee for misconduct connected with the 10employee’s employment shall be excluded from the employee’s base period wages 11under s. 108.06 (1) for purposes of benefit entitlement. This subsection paragraph 12does not preclude an employee who has employment with an employer other than 13the employer which terminated the employee for misconduct from establishing a 14benefit year using the base period wages excluded under this subsection paragraph 15if the employee qualifies to establish a benefit year under s. 108.06 (2) (a). The 16department shall charge to the fund’s balancing account any benefits otherwise 17chargeable to the account of an employer that is subject to the contribution 18requirements under ss. 108.17 and 108.18 from which base period wages are 19excluded under this subsection paragraph.SB486,5,320(am) For purposes of this subsection, “misconduct” means one or more actions 21or conduct evincing such willful or wanton disregard of an employer’s interests as is 22found in deliberate violations or disregard of standards of behavior which an 23employer has a right to expect of his or her employees, or in carelessness or 24negligence of such degree or recurrence as to manifest culpability, wrongful intent, 1or evil design of equal severity to such disregard, or to show an intentional and 2substantial disregard of an employer’s interests, or of an employee’s duties and 3obligations to his or her employer.SB486,5,54(bm) In addition to the conduct described in par. (am), “misconduct” includes 5all of the following:SB486,76Section 7. 108.04 (5) (a) to (g) of the statutes are renumbered 108.04 (5) (bm) 71. to 7., and 108.04 (5) (bm) 5. and 7., as renumbered, are amended to read:SB486,5,168108.04 (5) (bm) 5. Absenteeism by an employee on more than 2 occasions 9within the 120-day period before the date of the employee’s termination, unless 10otherwise specified by his or her employer in an employment manual of which the 11employee has acknowledged receipt with his or her signature, or excessive tardiness 12by an employee in violation of a policy of the employer that has been communicated 13to the employee, if the employee does not provide to his or her employer both notice 14and one or more valid reasons for the absenteeism or tardiness. For purposes of this 15subdivision, an employee’s notice and reason for an occasion of absenteeism or 16tardiness shall be analyzed under the standard specified in par. (am).SB486,5,23177. Unless directed by the employer, a willful and deliberate violation of a 18written and uniformly applied standard or regulation of the federal government or 19a state or Indian tribal government by an employee of an employer that is licensed 20or certified by a governmental agency, which standard or regulation has been 21communicated by the employer to the employee and which violation would cause the 22employer to be sanctioned or to have its license or certification suspended by the 23agency.SB486,824Section 8. 108.04 (5g) of the statutes is repealed.SB486,91Section 9. 108.04 (8) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB486,6,162108.04 (8) (a) Except as provided in par. (b), if If an employee fails, without 3good cause, to accept suitable work when offered, the employee is ineligible to 4receive benefits until the employee earns wages after the week in which the failure 5occurs equal to at least 6 times the employee’s weekly benefit rate under s. 108.05 6(1) in employment or other work covered by the unemployment insurance law of any 7state or the federal government. For purposes of requalification, the employee’s 8weekly benefit rate shall be that rate which would have been paid had the failure 9not occurred. This paragraph does not preclude an employee from establishing a 10benefit year during a period in which the employee is ineligible to receive benefits 11under this paragraph if the employee qualifies to establish a benefit year under s. 12108.06 (2) (a). Except as provided in par. (b), the The department shall charge to 13the fund’s balancing account any benefits otherwise chargeable to the account of an 14employer that is subject to the contribution requirements under ss. 108.17 and 15108.18 whenever an employee of that employer fails, without good cause, to accept 16suitable work offered by that employer.SB486,1017Section 10. 108.04 (8) (b) of the statutes is repealed.SB486,1118Section 11. 108.133 of the statutes is repealed.SB486,1219Section 12. 108.14 (8n) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:SB486,7,920108.14 (8n) (e) The department shall charge this state’s share of any benefits 21paid under this subsection to the account of each employer by which the employee 22claiming benefits was employed in the applicable base period, in proportion to the 23total amount of wages he or she earned from each employer in the base period, 24except that if s. 108.04 (1) (f), (5), (5g), (7) (a), (c), (cg), (e), (L), (q), (s), or (t), (7m), or 1(8) (a) to or (c), or 108.07 (3), (3r), or (5) (am) 2., or 108.133 (3) (f) would have applied 2to employment by such an employer who is subject to the contribution requirements 3of ss. 108.17 and 108.18, the department shall charge the share of benefits based on 4employment with that employer to the fund’s balancing account, or, if s. 108.04 (1) 5(f), (5), or (5g) or 108.07 (3) would have applied to an employer that is not subject to 6the contribution requirements of ss. 108.17 and 108.18, the department shall 7charge the share of benefits based on that employment in accordance with s. 108.07 8(5) (am) 1. and 2. The department shall also charge the fund’s balancing account 9with any other state’s share of such benefits pending reimbursement by that state.SB486,1310Section 13. 108.14 (8n) (e) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 11.... (this act), is amended to read:SB486,8,212108.14 (8n) (e) The department shall charge this state’s share of any benefits 13paid under this subsection to the account of each employer by which the employee 14claiming benefits was employed in the applicable base period, in proportion to the 15total amount of wages he or she earned from each employer in the base period, 16except that if s. 108.04 (1) (f), (5), (5g), (7) (a), (c), (cg), (e), (L), (q), (s), or (t), (7m), or 17(8) (a) or (c) or 108.07 (3), (3r), or (5) (am) 2. would have applied to employment by 18such an employer who is subject to the contribution requirements of ss. 108.17 and 19108.18, the department shall charge the share of benefits based on employment 20with that employer to the fund’s balancing account, or, if s. 108.04 (1) (f), or (5), or 21(5g) or 108.07 (3) would have applied to an employer that is not subject to the 22contribution requirements of ss. 108.17 and 108.18, the department shall charge 23the share of benefits based on that employment in accordance with s. 108.07 (5) 1(am) 1. and 2. The department shall also charge the fund’s balancing account with 2any other state’s share of such benefits pending reimbursement by that state.SB486,143Section 14. 108.141 (7) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB486,8,114108.141 (7) (a) The department shall charge the state’s share of each week of 5extended benefits to each employer’s account in proportion to the employer’s share 6of the total wages of the employee receiving the benefits in the employee’s base 7period, except that if the employer is subject to the contribution requirements of ss. 8108.17 and 108.18 the department shall charge the share of extended benefits to 9which s. 108.04 (1) (f), (5), (5g), (7) (a), (c), (cg), (e), (L), (q), (s), or (t), (7m), or (8) (a) 10to or (c), or 108.07 (3), (3r), or (5) (am) 2., or 108.133 (3) (f) applies to the fund’s 11balancing account.SB486,1512Section 15. 108.141 (7) (a) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 13.... (this act), is amended to read:SB486,8,2014108.141 (7) (a) The department shall charge the state’s share of each week of 15extended benefits to each employer’s account in proportion to the employer’s share 16of the total wages of the employee receiving the benefits in the employee’s base 17period, except that if the employer is subject to the contribution requirements of ss. 18108.17 and 108.18 the department shall charge the share of extended benefits to 19which s. 108.04 (1) (f), (5), (5g), (7) (a), (c), (cg), (e), (L), (q), (s), or (t), (7m), or (8) (a) 20or (c) or 108.07 (3), (3r), or (5) (am) 2. applies to the fund’s balancing account. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb486 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb486 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB486 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB486 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB486: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting